Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-719
Multicultural education, defined.

For purposes of sections 79-719 to 79-723, multicultural education includes, but is not limited to, studies relative to the culture, history, and contributions of African Americans, Hispanic Americans, Native Americans, and Asian Americans. Special emphasis shall be placed on human relations and sensitivity toward all races.

Laws 1992, LB 922, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,229;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 393.